North Dakota, session 69, HB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-31-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
4.1-31-01.1. Federal meat inspection regulations.
All federal meat and poultry inspection regulations effective as of October 19, 2022 July 3, 2024 , as
provided under title 9, Code of Federal Regulations, parts 301-320, 325, 329, 381, 391, 416-418, 424,
430, 441, 442, and 500, but excluding parts 307.5 and 381.38, are incorporated by reference and made
a part of this title.

H. B. NO. 1085 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1085.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State